Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 24 Organization and Corporate Procedures of Legal Reserve Stockand Mutual Insurers
§ 26-24-151.
Mutual members' share of assets upon liquidation.

If a domestic mutual insurer is liquidated, its assets remaining after discharge of its indebtedness, policy obligations, repayment of contributed or borrowed surplus, if any, and expenses of administration, shall be distributed to currently existing persons who were members of the insurer for at least one (1) year and who were its members at any time within thirty-six (36) months preceding the date the liquidation was authorized or ordered, or the date of last termination of the insurer’s certificate of authority, whichever is earlier. If the commissioner has reason to believe that the insurer’s management caused or encouraged a reduction in the number of the insurer’s members in anticipation of liquidation and for the purpose of reducing thereby the number of persons entitled to share in distribution of the insurer’s assets, he may enlarge the thirty-six (36) month qualification period by any additional period he deems reasonable.

The insurer shall make a reasonable classification of its policies held by the members specified in subsection (a) of this section and a formula based upon that classification for determining the equitable distributive share of each such member. The classification and formula are subject to the commissioner’s approval.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 514; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-514; W.S. 1977, § 26-29-152; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.